Washington statutes.
RCW 10.37.010

Pleadings required in criminal proceedings.

No pleading other than an indictment, information or complaint shall be required on the part of the state in any criminal proceedings in any court of the state, and when such pleading is in the manner and form as provided by law the defendant shall be required to plead thereto as prescribed by law without any further action or proceedings of any kind on the part of the state.

[ 1925 ex.s. c 150 s 3; RRS s 2050-1. FORMER PARTS OF SECTION: (i) 1927 c 103 s 1; Code 1881 s 764; RRS s 2023, now codified as RCW 10.37.015. (ii) 1909 c 87 s 1; 1891 c 117 s 1; 1890 p 100 s 1; RRS s 2024, now codified as RCW 10.37.026. (iii) 1891 c 28 s 19; Code 1881 s 1003; 1873 p 224 s 186; 1869 p 240 s 181; RRS s 2054, now codified as RCW 10.37.025.]